apertium-lit.lit.dix
    <pardef n="mėn/uo__n_m">
      <e><p><l>esio</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esiui</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esį</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esyje</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esi</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esiu</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uo</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esių</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esiams</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esius</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esiuose</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esiai</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esiais</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esiai</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="dyd/is__n_m">
      <e><p><l>žio</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žiui</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>į</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yje</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žiu</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žių</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žiams</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žius</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žiuose</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žiai</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žiais</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žiai</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="radij/as__n_m">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ui</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ą</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uje</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>au</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ams</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uose</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ais</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="dal/is__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ies</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iai</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>į</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yje</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imi</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ims</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yse</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imis</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="vil/tis__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ties</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čiai</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tį</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tyje</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tie</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>timi</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tis</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>či</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tims</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tis</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tyse</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tys</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>timis</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tys</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="eln/ias__n_m">
      <e><p><l>io</l><r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iui</l><r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ią</l><r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yje</l><r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iau</l><r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iu</l><r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ias</l><r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ių</l><r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iams</l><r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ius</l><r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iuose</l><r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iai</l><r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iais</l><r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iai</l><r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="vartotojas"><i>vartotoj</i><par n="radij/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="veiksmažodis"><i>veiksmažod</i><par n="dyd/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="įspūdis"><i>įspūd</i><par n="dyd/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dalis"><i>dal</i><par n="dal/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="veidrodis"><i>veidrod</i><par n="dyd/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kalavijas"><i>kalavij</i><par n="radij/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="elnias"><i>eln</i><par n="eln/ias__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="žodis"><i>žod</i><par n="dyd/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dydis"><i>dyd</i><par n="dyd/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="viltis"><i>vil</i><par n="vil/tis__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mokytojas"><i>mokytoj</i><par n="radij/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="balandis"><i>baland</i><par n="dyd/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="radijas"><i>radij</i><par n="radij/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gyventojas"><i>gyventoj</i><par n="radij/as__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="laikrodis"><i>laikrod</i><par n="dyd/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="medis"><i>med</i><par n="dyd/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vietovardis"><i>vietovard</i><par n="dyd/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mėnuo"><i>mėn</i><par n="mėn/uo__n_m"/></e>
